Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6612XC (2) 91 ms/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 403.19, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. School district foundation property 3 taxes levied under section 257.3 and deposited into the special 4 fund as the result of a division of revenue under this section 5 shall not be expended for or otherwise used in connection with 6 an urban renewal project approved on or after January 1, 2025, 7 that in whole or in part includes the planning, construction, 8 or operation of a stadium or arena primarily intended for use 9 by one or more professional sports teams. 10 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 11 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 12